Another early memory was getting my first train set.

Matthew found it difficult to suggest such a thing to a man like Cashman, but, surprisingly, the businessman did not seem to take the question amiss.

The closure of the bridge did not make good economic sense for the Poles, but their demolition of the bridge in 1928 made even less sense.

The closure of the bridge did not make good economic sense for the Poles, but their demolition of the bridge in 1928 made even less sense.

The city had to offer higher than average wages to attract civil servants from the Reich and was also forced to make a contribution to the salary and expenses of the League of Nations High Commissioner to the tune of £44,000 per year.

So they would actually do the shopping for the material, and then they would go awayand look at pattern books and decide what sort of patterns they wanted,what sort of dress it was that they wanted to make.

So people have been forced to look at the way in which they are doing the work in er conjunction with er the manual for whatever other book of rules they have I wished they'd do they carry out their work.

Sizzling shades of terracotta teamed with cool blue make a simple but eye-catching statement on crisp white walls.

He might be directly responsible for taking away her pleasure in singing - though that would surely be only a temporary aberration on her part - but she could only hold him toaccount for her loneliness if it was his company she was missing.

His smile was more of a leer, and unconsciously Rory took a step nearer to Adam's powerful frame.

She could have hired a team of professionals to do the work, of course, but she'd wanted to be able to look round at the end of it all and know she'd done it.

She could have hired a team of professionals to do the work, of course, but she'd wanted to be able to look round at the end of it all and know she'd done it.

She works intensively from nine to six, skipping lunch and often taking work home to do after her two children, William, 9, and Charlotte, 7, have gone to bed.

You all know what Strats sound like and what 5-position selectors do, but to get an overall picture of this guitar I lined it up against a regular office hack (a Tokai hybrid with an old `58 Fender neck and Alnico ProII's in the middle and bridge positions) and can report that the SRVcame out well.

We've actually talked about doing a deal together.

Milgram varied the context of the experimentsystematically, sometimes by allowing the `teacher' to see the effectsof the shocks on the `learner', sometimes having them in the same room,sometimes not having the learner scream in pain, and so on.

Milgram varied the context of the experimentsystematically, sometimes by allowing the `teacher' to see the effectsof the shocks on the `learner', sometimes having them in the same room,sometimes not having the learner scream in pain, and so on.

Patrick made a study of a Glasgow gang:

If I can get three or four dishes into the freezer I can do a dinner party without worrying about being home in time to cook.'

Agnes said: `She must have got some new identity.

Firstly, foreign investors, where we will get an ad-hoc interest.

Will he get his chance?

Her animosity did her throbbing head no good at all.

And if the generator gives up the ghost in the night you've got a torch on the table, and a candle.

`An early night would do no harm.

`Now for heaven's sake get some sleep - and let me do the same!'

Providing moments of steadiness amid the upheavals of the lovers is Anthony Bailey giving a sound performance as the local doctor.

In fact where toxic substances are odorous, the odour can have a positive effect on health, effectively warning us of their presence.

Her doctor told her she had dermatitis and recommended treatment which had no effect.

A matron was installed, and three helpers, one of whom did the cooking.

If the Soviet Union were `catching up and overtaking' a stationary object, Soviet practice would make sense, but the process itself is a continuous one, and the competitor is a moving target.

The realities of modern war do not brook much choice in the matter.

In the struggle to advance, outmanoeuvre rivals and be heard by superiors, factional loyalty (loyalty to one's patron) may take precedence over policy interest.

They told the old woman to do her work and then hurry after them.

Best of all is simply to let nature do its work.

In 1986 the English YHA did some market research, learnt some painful truths and embarked on amodernisation programme unhandily titled `The Product DevelopmentMarketing Plan'.

Prayers sprang to the lips of men who had made a trade out of phoney miracles.

Kimata gave up her 29-year career at the Ministry of Labour to take charge of Aeon Forest, Body Shop's leading franchise in Japan.

In effect, we are doing some of the work unpaid, with a view to getting more of the benefits when the product sells.'

So, after nearly half a century of keeping its head down, it is beginning to take a higher profile abroad.

To give one example, items in a coordinated list are typically incompatibles, and gross deviations from this lead to abnormality:

It was significant that, when the war took a grave turn the following year, it was to every Anglicanincumbent in the land (and no doubt to many others, though I can speakonly for the parish clergy) that Duff Cooper, the Home Secretary, sentletters expressing apprehension of the state of public morale and urging the incumbents to do their utmost to help raise it.

The details have escaped me, but he and SirAndrew Clarke, as churchwardens (their memorial tablets are near to each other in the south transept) had been obliged to take legal action over the advowson - the word which, because of its precision of meaning and its sound, I could see he enjoyedintroducing; but they had evidently covered themselves in so doing,because, the Anglican Church being established, their office carriedofficial responsibilities.

so remember that, do when you do the bearings if you're doing some, erm examples, or you're looking through, or you're doing some revision, get up, stand up, and think, right what's tothink of, oh it's not there, like if I'm taking a bearing on theseflowers, it's, well, just that much in it, you know,

so remember that, do when you do the bearings if you're doing some, erm examples, or you're looking through, or you're doing some revision, get up, stand up, and think, right what's tothink of, oh it's not there, like if I'm taking a bearing on theseflowers, it's, well, just that much in it, you know,

so remember that, do when you do the bearings if you're doing some, erm examples, or you're looking through, or you're doing some revision, get up, stand up, and think, right what's tothink of, oh it's not there, like if I'm taking a bearing on theseflowers, it's, well, just that much in it, you know,

`Why does a woman work 10 years to change a man's habits and then complain that he's not the man she married?'

Anyone who suspects they might have bad breath can check by looking at their tongue.

A short-list of five lawyers was drawn up from which Diana made her choice.

Republicans Abroad and Democrats Abroad have been allocated 200 tickets each - preference given to those who make a £25 donation.

Miss Crawford would probably stand a much better chance of becoming an actress if she stopped talking about it and started to do the necessary work to bring about her ambition.

`To do more work for you.'

I must go and do some work!

I will attempt to do this with reference to the issue of the social consequences of closing primary schools in rural areas .

There is another approach which considered intentional social behaviour with regard to the outside and makes the minimum assumption that people differentiate the local environment (in terms of group, zone, sphere or arena) from that which is outside.

Where a plaintiff's injuries prevent him doing DIY work, which he had previously done, the extra cost of such work is recoverable as damages.

Where a plaintiff's injuries prevent him doing DIY work, which he had previously done, the extra cost of such work is recoverable as damages.

If you are travelling by car, calculate as above then make the necessary accommodation only reduction as detailed on page 80.

He took a slight step forward and, taking his friend's chin in his hand, lifted his face so that Ludovico was forced to look up into his eyes.

First, the philosophical source from which citizenship emerged needs to be recognized, as does the relationship which existed between the philosophy and New Liberalism.

In setting up women's refuges and rape crisis centres it does not seek revenge, it seeks to take care of the survivors and to change the policies of state agencies.

`Now 'ow do I look, Sam?' she asked as she stood preening herself.

The question can still be raised whether Pound had any access to Virgil except through translation.

Men are all little boys at heart, when all's said and done, and it's not only women that like to have these littleplaythings about to make a break in the daily round.

Mrs Cullam made no comment.

So an Indian woman, Kamala, was paid to take care of the little girl.

Or I would have to do miserable work like illustrating, or even commercial stuff, to keep the home going.

From next December we will also have a budget which draws a distinction between current andcapital spending current spending being looking after hospital patients; capital spending being building a new hospital for them.

Liverpool's third choice keeper is set to jump queue ahead of David James and make his first appearance of the season in the absence of the suspended Bruce Grobbelaar.

None of this `feel the burn' malarky which she says can do more harm than good.

`We paid almost £9,000 for the car but we will be lucky to get £4,000 for it,' said Mr Lewis who believes the teenagershould at least have been made to do community work.

A six-month-old baby girl had a miraculous escape when a firework exploded, and a fragment landed an inch from her eye in Seaforth.

9.1 will make an up-front payment of a deposit of the irrecoverable advance in Part (1) of Schedule 4

`I much prefer this music,' Herman said, doing an awkward shuffle.

Just think what it will be like doing the high jump with 50,000 people watching you!'

As if they were doing a bizarre dance, followed by Marx, Herr Nordern backed through the tiny vestibule, into the sitting-room, and a silent, apprehensivecircle of Norderns.

EVERYONE should take care in the sun, but you should be especially careful if you have:

A healthy lifestyle, including taking exercise and avoiding smoking and heavy drinking see page 27-30 will reduce the possibility of developing osteoporosis.

She didn't need Maggie to remind her of the odds against a baby's survival in the alleys, and she loved this one enough to make the ultimate sacrifice.

The standard housing comes with a flat viewing port giving a reversed viewfinder image looking vertically down into the housing.

We also did a deep dive, to 30 metres, at Easdale Quarry on Seil Island.

I mean, I don't want to er, betray my partner here but erm, I mean he does his share but he doesn't do his full share.

I mean, I don't want to er, betray my partner here but erm, I mean he does his share but he doesn't do his full share.

I mean, I don't want to er, betray my partner here but erm, I mean he does his share but he doesn't do his full share.

I mean, I don't want to er, betray my partner here but erm, I mean he does his share but he doesn't do his full share.

The very special problems that sudden death can cause make this benefit a very significant and welcome one.

Like last year, it also seeks a disapplication of the pre-VXKVK rights on a rights issue so as to allow the Directors, when making a rights issue, to exclude or make such other arrangements as may be appropriate to resolve legal or practical problems which mightfor example arise with overseas shareholders.

Like last year, it also seeks a disapplication of the pre-VXKVK rights on a rights issue so as to allow the Directors, when making a rights issue, to exclude or make such other arrangements as may be appropriate to resolve legal or practical problems which mightfor example arise with overseas shareholders.

Soccer coaching for girls in Bristol has been given a boost from British Gas South Western.

I don't know why anyone picked me to give a speech.

`I've made your life a misery.'

Then, only a beat later it seemed to him, shame and anger raced back to take possession of him again, and so overcome by theseconflicting feelings was he that he had no consciousness of her in allthis, until he became aware, to his surprise, that she was shaking himout of his stupor, bringing him to her again with her mouth and herhands.

Still, in spite of the assiduous attentions which M. Apéritif and others paid her, Miranda would have liked Xanthe to make some reassuring remark in return.

The famous film director from France could speak no English, and so Miranda was being sent to do the interview as well as provide the paper's weeklycaricature; she had the address of the location, a newsagent's in theHigh Street of a part of the city she had never heard mentioned before,Giblett Park, though she had lived in London most of her life; the Press Office had said that he would give her ten minutes between takes, ormore if she were lucky and the filming was going well and Jean-ClaudeMeursault was feeling mellow.

What we are able to do in my job is to do what I was happy to do which is to give a performance in aid of a charity, one soon learns how to expend one's energy and in which direction to focus it.

I planned to make one chair as a trial piece, and, if it looked right, to do a real run of six, using the trial pieces as `templates'.

For instance, at the Conservative PartyConference in Brighton in 1988, we had to turn the building `back tofront' for security reasons and have the main entrance at the rear.

For instance, at the Conservative PartyConference in Brighton in 1988, we had to turn the building `back tofront' for security reasons and have the main entrance at the rear.

Fourth, don't always do a news release on all the grass roots activities.

Fourth, don't always do a news release on all the grass roots activities.

One of the simplest planning points is to ensure that the timing of dividend and ACT payments is arranged to give the maximum cash flow advantage.

A gift to a charity of shares in a close company gave rise to a charge to capital transfer tax where the company had an interest in possession in a trust.

The venture capitalist has been there before; he should be able to recognise the warning signs and take appropriate action.'

D Ltd would then, in turn, make a franked payment to A Ltd.

Crawford was reported to be doing excellent work, but as the inter-provincial matches werecancelled as the war worsened, the association's finances worsened too:the Coach's Fund was now deeply in debt.

anything bad you can get a good run then you, you just get a bad er run of carpets of the weaving

because, well I get paid off when the receiverscome in, I was about three month out before I got sent back for and erthe starting wage was, I think we actually got a wee rise, I think we were the only section that

because, well I get paid off when the receiverscome in, I was about three month out before I got sent back for and erthe starting wage was, I think we actually got a wee rise, I think we were the only section that

A few did escape, of course.'

`The stationmasters' had clearly done their work.

`Whatever you do, I will support you,' he wrote in 1927, `and if you want to have a talk I will meet you at Annecy at lunch any day you care to name…'

Erm I don't know whether Charles has said anything about who people are, Barley Hall, Charles is the historical consultant, he's done all the research .

Erm I don't know whether Charles has said anything about who people are, Barley Hall, Charles is the historical consultant, he's done all the research .

Er it was known by archaeologists and the RoyalCommission of Ancient and Historical Monuments had done a survey, but it had only done a very brief survey, and they said this is part of something left of a medieval building here.

Er it was known by archaeologists and the RoyalCommission of Ancient and Historical Monuments had done a survey, but it had only done a very brief survey, and they said this is part of something left of a medieval building here.

Despite qualifying sixth, the Reynard driver made a superb start and was in second place by the first corner, taking the lead from Gianni Morbidelli's Lola by the end of the lap.

He had devoted Sunday evening to making a plan of action and knew exactly what he and everyone else he could press into service was going to be doing this morning.

Peter Yeo was obviously delighted to do any service, however modest, for her and bustled her away, returning belatedly to ask McLeish if he would like a similar facility, which he accepted, obedient to the unwritten CID rule that you lookedafter your physical needs at any moment that opportunity offered,because you never knew when you were going to get stuck for hourswithout help.

My impression was that since it was to be held in London, Angela was doing the work, with a good deal of help from colleagues at Yeo Davis.

SILLARS STALKER*, who was winning for the firsttime on the Flat when landing an apprentice handicap at Hamilton Parkeight days ago, should make a successful return to the Scottish track in today's Levy Board Handicap (5.15).

A World Cup final is the wrong time and place to prove a point and the English management must take the blame for letting the press and the Australians sucker them into self destruction.

Jan was making a comeback this season and played in the curtain-raiser to the Currie Cup Final .

Canada ought to be given the encouragement of making a serious bid.

`What roles did particular participants play?'

You are likely to make a success of meetings by recognising when others are using tactics such as these.

Students and business people alike are faced with the challenge of making the best use of their time.

The question is whether the Treaty of Maastricht would make such a transfer of allegiance imperative.

Pride is taken in making a detection of this importance and the section police dislike CID taking any credit when the `skulls' are brought in by them.

Pride is taken in making a detection of this importance and the section police dislike CID taking any credit when the `skulls' are brought in by them.

It takes a certain type of man to do a neighbourhood beat.

If the former is correct, does the United Kingdom have a constitution?

I have a reputation for honesty and fair trading - and it's well known that I don't have any truck with shady deals,' she informed him bluntly.

Rested and fed, she was ready to do battle again.

`But there must be a point… when you've hosed off all the muck and the glaze and the bits of overpainting and your musksof Araby have done their work and you get to the point when you know thatwhat you see before you is what the chap would have seen before him when he stopped painting all those centuries ago.

He couldn't make any sense of it at all.

Livewire offers help by giving free advice to young entrepreneurs.

The receiver of the call could give evidence that the grossly offensive message was received on a public telephone.

May God bless you and may you have a long life.'

`I grew up in the country,' she murmured, not sure why she had told him that because it had no bearing on the subject.

It was on one such time early last February, two months ago, when, having driven to Cheltenham to do an interview, she detoured to call in.

Let me get your coat.

Although his features were almost hidden by the collar of his goosedown parka he nodded and did something with his eyebrows that made the company smile.

Rosen took a deep breath and, forgetting the rhythm of breathing, held it.

Law gave credence to such fears by his unashamedespousal of the image created round him; in May 1912 he told theNational Union that" nobody knows better than I do that political work cannot be done on strictly business lines, but the nearer you can approach to business lines the better for thepolitical work".

Bonar Law was prepared to make the right noises - in 1913 at Manchester he called for a positive social policy inDisraelian lines for" the swing of the pendulum is not enough", but hewould give no more active support.

And as we have seen, predicted changes in aggregate demand will have no effect on real output, or real economic activity - they will only affect prices.

Craig: And you, Sandra Gibbons, have got no sense.

I must go to England to do the work and I want to marry Elizabeth when I return.'

The price of such an agreement, of course, would be electoral reform - which, purely incidentally, would give his party the balance of power after any election in the foreseeable future.

But 35 per cent of all voters want him to do a deal with the Liberal Democrats, including a pledge for electoral reform.

A PRISONER who did a clothes switch and walked out with visitors to Acklington prison, Northumberland, was on the run yesterday.

It is common for a Member who has asked aquestion on an important matter but who is dissatisfied with the answerthat he has received to give notice that he wishes to raise the matter again on the adjournment and to do so.

Ropes let down into it seem to go down forever, coins dropped never make a sound, etc.

The Zombies are aware enough to hide in the darkness and will gain surprise unless the leading adventurer makes a successful I test.

In order to make this decision, the retailer needs to do some market research into the socioeconomics of the area.

If you already work in a shop - or have done shop work in the past you may find that some of the procedures described here are done differently where you work.

If you already work in a shop - or have done shop work in the past you may find that some of the procedures described here are done differently where you work.

We know that Julian had at least two servants called Sara and Alice, who did her shopping and ran errands.

Not only did he do stupendous work in many areas of pure mathematics but he alsodevoted much time to probability, theory of errors, geodesy, mechanics,electromagnetism, optics and even actuarial science!

Not only did he do stupendous work in many areas of pure mathematics but he alsodevoted much time to probability, theory of errors, geodesy, mechanics,electromagnetism, optics and even actuarial science!

It's very good good erm good thing for the partyand they're usually quite starved of practical campaigning ideas and sowe regularly try every at least every year to go and do a tour and erm we've been giving them we we're trying to rope them in on the various activities because they're crying out for

She was still taking medication after her breast cancer operation but she seemed to be on top form and very bubbly and full of plans for the future.

FILM producer Mark Rosenberg, who made Oscar winner The Killing Fields, had a heart attack and died yesterday.

Though it didn't leave any physical signs, `it did untold damage,' says Homer.

But those who really wish to curry favour with Mad Carew can sponsor a five-course dinner plus wine for two for £70 and get a generous mention on this page.

She had had eight children, only four of whom survived, and had done hard physical work all her life because my grandfather had poor health.

We can leave in a convoy from my house to ensure that everyone gets transport.

We stopped the boat and drifted for a while, andthe birds relaxed and moved back towards Bound Skerry the rock in a long line - which did the trick!

In fact he had even made some appropriately sophisticated comment.

And I'm intending to, to hold a few moreassemblies as well to sort of get interest going again because it's been a while since we did an assembly on it, so if we do another one, that usually gets it going again doesn't it?

And I'm intending to, to hold a few moreassemblies as well to sort of get interest going again because it's been a while since we did an assembly on it, so if we do another one, that usually gets it going again doesn't it?

By being reared alone, it gets all the food its foster parents can bring and it has auseful adaptation that ensures that the food keeps on coming - a huge,startlingly red gape.

The `naked' crab moved about 60 cm (2 ft) away while the first crab nipped out of its damaged shell and took up residence in the new one.

It take s lot more than just physical attraction to make a lasting, happy marriage.

When making a contract be sure that you are both talking about the same thing.

Also, Tabitha never quite got around to doing as much maintenance as she meant to.

The Israeli government has been agonisingly slow to take up the challenge, although it has calculated that US$3 billionwill be needed over three years for housing, job creation and otheraspects of large-scale immigrant absorption.

We need to know why the Origin of Species had so much influence despite the relative failure of its chief explanatory tool.

While not seeking to cave your opponent's ribs in, do strike hard enough to leave the refereeing panel in no doubt at all that contact has been made on the scoring area.

This obvious fact is not always exploited thereis a tendency to regard the keyboard simply as a typewriter whereas anykey can be chosen to have any function.

They'll knit that on these machines so they'll stitch transfer, they'll cable, they'll, they'll do base.

BESO looks forward to developing its collaboration with TRANSAID and to making greater use of its bank of expertise, not only in transportation but also in other fields in support of TRANSAID's objectives.

Language is one tool by which women are given an artificial sense of inferiority.

But the grand design was torpedoed when Lord Hanson made a bid for Imperial that shareholders found impossible to resist.

They usually disappointed everyone by recallingthat he was remarkable for his unremarkableness, just another kid on the block; not a hero, not a superstar at sports, not especially remembered for outstanding feats of school bravado nor had he made any particular impression on the girls.

There was an added difficulty that the three ofthen, would break into convulsions of laughter, verging on hysterics,with Hopper somewhere off camera rolling around in the bushes and,according to Nicholson, `totally freaked out' while Jack was forcinghimself to be relatively straight, do his serious acting and hold the whole thing together: `This used to be a helluva good country…'

Nor, at least for the manufacturing sector wherethe argument would seem most relevant, was there any evidence that morecapital intensive establishments were less likely to be making use of such workers.

No really clear picture was distinguishable,except for private manufacturing establishments where, as Table 3.8suggests, establishments making less use of overtime are also less likely to be making use of fixed-term contract workers.

No really clear picture was distinguishable,except for private manufacturing establishments where, as Table 3.8suggests, establishments making less use of overtime are also less likely to be making use of fixed-term contract workers.

You say that I need to discuss copy when I've got there if you've got copy if they've had full colour before then they will have bromides and separations and things like

So I had to take it from the telesales side to get the appointment to get in the door to do a demonstration and then to do the after sales.

So I had to take it from the telesales side to get the appointment to get in the door to do a demonstration and then to do the after sales.

I did a 50% water change and phoned the manufacturer who told me to keep an eye on things.

The Select Directory at the end of this book seeks to make this choice more systematic and to reduce, at least partially, the inevitable element of risk.

A number of smaller British firms are also making an important contribution, such as Tyzack, Merton, John Stork and specialists like City headhunters Baines Gwinner.

The search firm chosen depended on a mixture ofthe clients own requirements for the assignment, its past experiencewith individual headhunters - based on how good the particular consultant doing the work had been - and `how we like their presentation'.

This would lead to confusion and complication;(2) It may imperil certain aspects of the regulatory system, for instance by concluding that Chinese walls are ineffective to prevent the attribution of information, or because advance disclosure that wouldsatisfy fiduciary requirements is impossible, a broker/dealer is alwaysliable when buying or selling as principal; (3) It does not appear to give any recognition to the expertise of the bodies to which Parliament has entrusted the regulation of financial services.

The local garden or allotment society may have access to good cheap muck; stables sometimes let you take it free, but this will be steaming fresh and needs time, and space, to rot.

He governs, so far as he is able to, on borrowed time because none of the groups contending for power yet feels strong enough to make a grab for it.

3 On balance, does regulation work?

The more recently developed systems have addressed the need for higher level knowledge, by making greater use of linguistic information, particularly semantic (e.g. SYSTRAN [Toma, 1977] and EUROTRA [Raw et al, 1988]).

It had been hoped that the removal of exchangerate fluctuations between EC currencies would constitute the first stage toward monetary union, but the widespread acceptance of floating hasmade this aim more difficult to achieve, although the European MonetarySystem has had some success in this respect.

It had been hoped that the removal of exchangerate fluctuations between EC currencies would constitute the first stage toward monetary union, but the widespread acceptance of floating hasmade this aim more difficult to achieve, although the European MonetarySystem has had some success in this respect.

All have now done an average of ten days' sailing aboard British Steel Challenge and are being given what is termed `continuation training'.

The insurance will be of special interest to those who might otherwise be unable to get insurance because their cruising ground, manning, or the boat itself might prevent it.

But curious growths appeared: Green Grow The Rushes (1951) was the film technicians' union's attempt to make a go of it.

As in the 1979 report, despite developments inBiblical scholarship, it asserted that throughout the Bible there wasstrong disapproval for homosexual practice but sinful human beings still have to make moral sense of their lives:

He, like most of their bodyguards, was devoted to the royal family and would give his life for them.

Just as a ship needs a captain, so too does the individual need a governing principle.

Cowley took the picture and smiled as he peered at it.

He jogged easily back to his apartment, to snatch some breakfast, and was just passing his own car when Control made contact with him again through the bulky R/T he carried.

Whoever it is made a start with the cat and dog, the family pets.'

Naturally, Richie Benaud and the home players took their full share of the credit, but it was Worrell who was hero number one.

And it's obvious that he's made a start with the clunch pit murder; but that isn't noted either.

In addition to the theoretical nexus between this and knightly status, the sumptuary act of 1533 bracketed men in general worth that much with some of the knights who took precedence as esquires.

Providing explanations for discipline will not necessarily have an immediate effect on children's obedience.

Graham Bradley, who injured a finger on Thursday, is also fit to take his National mount on Rowlandsons Jewels.

A voter who gives a first-preference vote and a second-preference vote to Fianna Failcandidates and a third-preference vote to a Fine Gael candidate isreally asking with his first two choices that Fianna Fail should win the election and with his third that Fine Gael should prevail.

A processor on the train would match thatinformation with the train's performance, and the brakes could beapplied if the driver did not take the required action.

As the pressures mounted, Lenin was forced toadmit that `an unskilled labourer or a cook cannot immediately get onwith the job of state administration' and that only a few thousandworkers had any experience of work in government.

My Leathern Bottle did thy Drought supply;

East Germany's leader, Erich Honecker, did his best to pretend he had cured the malaise by expelling `anti-social elements, who have a bad attitude to work and also to normal living conditions'.

East Germany's leader, Erich Honecker, did his best to pretend he had cured the malaise by expelling `anti-social elements, who have a bad attitude to work and also to normal living conditions'.

At least now they can get their act together.

`Over the next couple of months he got his life together and he met this girl and they got engaged.

Left soon after we played, but not before Miki and Chris did an interview with Tommy Vance for the Friday Rock Show .

With even low-budget pictures like The Crying Game proving difficult to finance, is there really anywhere left to do the work he wants?

what do they do a bus shuttle?

what do they do a bus shuttle?

when we're open so I'll get a delivery on Thursday and I'll get some er

We didn't sight of her once, even though the vet had told me it could be an hour before the drug took effect.

`Mind you, some of the older officers get us to do a back-up report in the old way,' Chiodini told him.

That might possibly have done the damage to Valesio's head, at close range.

These embraced the daughter of the famous Octagon minister Dr John Taylor, Susannah, the Opies, the Barbaulds; theantislavery poetess Mrs Barbauld was an Aikin daughter and made a link between antislavery and the liberal political journalism of her father and brother in the Annual Review .

Voluntary personal abstention continued in amodest way through to the end of American slavery but plans positivelyto develop free-labour cultivation in the American South, India or WestAfrica came to little in the 1850s and the gave any serious consideration after equalisation of the sugar duties beginning in 1846 to a policy of discriminating in favour of free-grown produce.

To make this connection is to perform role (or role-to-role) mapping.

But an election to take interest in lieu of profits will not exclude the right to an account for capital profits made between dissolution and sale-see Barclays Bank Trust Co Ltd v Bluff [1982] Ch 172.

If the court can spell out an implied agreement that all parties recognised that the continuing partners would beentitled to carry on the practice after the departure of an outgoingpartner, the right to a full dissolution will not be available, but the outgoing partner will have the benefit of s43 of the Act and the continuing partnerswill, after all necessary accounts and inquiries have been taken, beobliged to pay him the value of his interest in the firm-see Sobell vBoston [1975] 1 WLR 1587.

If the court can spell out an implied agreement that all parties recognised that the continuing partners would beentitled to carry on the practice after the departure of an outgoingpartner, the right to a full dissolution will not be available, but the outgoing partner will have the benefit of s43 of the Act and the continuing partnerswill, after all necessary accounts and inquiries have been taken, beobliged to pay him the value of his interest in the firm-see Sobell vBoston [1975] 1 WLR 1587.

Fifteen companies combined last week to make a single joint submission to the Object Management Group in its quest for Object Services, its first such Request For Technology (UX No 420).

For the first time in his life, Peter found her pitiful, a tiny figure who had made a cage of her routines and spent her life staring through the bars at the glorious unpredictability of the world outside.

A £600,000 transfer was almost in place when the French club made an unprecedented contractual demand, a morality clause in Nicholas's contract which would guarantee the players good behaviour.

In the tumult which ensued, the terrified monks made their escape, only to find their way blocked by the same young lord with fifty knights, who threatened them with death.

Lady Rutherford leapt with alacrity at the chance to do a good deed.

I enjoy walking on the common land myself, but if I'm willing to make the sacrifice, why aren't you?'

Transactions of this kind must make us pause before we condemn all landlords as Gradgrinds, or make too large assumptions about the nature of medieval serfdom.

They lived the lives of the folk among whom they worked; and this may have helped many of them to make real contact with their parishioners.

The main-chain amides of Gly15 and Lys17 interact directly with the phosphate of T8', and the side-chain hydroxyl of Ser18 makes a water-mediated contact.

I want to argue, however, readers use their knowledge of reading as a socially differentiated practice to make sense of texts.

So when everyone said, `Aren't you doing any market research?'

By then it was agreed that Karen would do temporary work until she came to Hillmarden House in November.

Fraser of Neill's claimed that only" a few men can set music and only a few men can do a table and only a few men can do anything out of the way"."

It is impossible to dodge the question ofmarriage: as has already been noted, the majority of women did marry,and if they lived in Edinburgh, they almost invariably gave up paid work on marriage.

Only rarely were women doing similar work to men.

The rest took early retirement at different points over the following three years.

Venturi was a university teacher, son of a famous father, Adolpho Venturi, who had made a substantial contribution to the publication of documents of Italian art.

Although the committee accepts the DTp's contention that individual pollution accidents had hitherto had little effect, it believes that the rise in incidents in the crowded North Sea and English Channel is a serious" cause for concern".

Although the committee accepts the DTp's contention that individual pollution accidents had hitherto had little effect, it believes that the rise in incidents in the crowded North Sea and English Channel is a serious" cause for concern".

Even so, Galileo had many topics on his mind and was not solely doing astronomical research, so that the priority of a month or so could have been true.

I did wish, and spent a happy preparatory period in a haze of vodka and tonic.

No matter how many causes and causal circumstances existed for an effect, it was true of each cause that if it occurred, so did the effect.

Even if it were true that all of consciousnessand only that fell under statements of the three kinds, or relatedkinds, we would by means of this truth get only a wholly uninformative conception of consciousness.

As for the ideas of having reference to and being directed up oil, they too must be given sense consonant with the nature of the given contents and objects and the various modes of consciousness.

As for the ideas of having reference to and being directed up oil, they too must be given sense consonant with the nature of the given contents and objects and the various modes of consciousness.

That is, there is that which is common, or of one kind, in each of the experiences of feeling a sensation, beingdepressed, thinking a question, taking a decision, and so on.

Russell took this view at one point (1917a), giving a mixed bag of reasons.

It is the position of the switch - on rather than off - that made the windscreen wipers start to work, as it is the position of the heater and the density of the snow that cause the other mentioned effects.

The usual way of coping with their father had been to make no reference to anything untoward that might have happened, for fear of bringing it all upon them again.

`That Eve's father did a terrible act at the funeral, cursing and shouting….'

He learned the moves of the game at four years old, and made his first competitive appearance in Vienna two years later.

Protheroe lifted his moustache with a forefinger, as if getting air to his mouth.

The authority to issue cattle vouchers enhancedthe power and status of a headman, but many of those assigned to thistask could not see why they should take the trouble to inquire into the origins of the cattle concerned.

But Saatchi and Saatchi, who made the ad, said: `The sign language is Auslan, in common usage in Australia.'

Father-of-three Leslie Tobutt, 42, told police he watched them making love in an armchair and added: `I went wild.'

The Pakistan Airlines Airbus slammed into a mountain and exploded while making the nerve-racking approach to notorious Katmandu airport.

He was due to make a court appearance today as his lawyers fight extradition to Jersey.

She'd made the move to Hollywood with her Dutch artist husband Luc Leestemaker in the hope of breaking into the movie big-time.

Alan Model, 35, made the illegal stop in a town centre as he popped into a shop.

The impression that the party was ready to do a deal with the Liberal Democrats contributed to the election defeat, he said.

Though Macao's small population made it easier for Portugal to make a grand gesture, it triggered renewed bitterness in Hong Kong.

Though Macao's small population made it easier for Portugal to make a grand gesture, it triggered renewed bitterness in Hong Kong.

He also said that the Prince and Princess of Wales would not make a planned visit to China in November `so long as thoseresponsible for the atrocities over the past weekend remain in controlof the Chinese government'.

Often they did their cause more harm than good.

The camp was run by the British and one of the officers had taken an interest in him.'

The big Illuyshin jet made a smooth landing at Sheremetov airport.

What principles do children rely on as they analyse the structure of words and make use of their knowledge?

But she would never forget the very differentlifestyle of her early years - she was 20 when they emigrated; theveneration of her father and her father's father, the gross insecurityunder which they lived; the ever-present threat of injury and loss, andthe belittling malice; experiences which moulded and coloured her wholeexistence, as did her knowledge of Polish, Russian and Yiddish.

Quebec was the last province to give the vote to women.

`Why doesn't the leather break?' she muttered as the home continued its terrifying charge downhill.

There are lots of companies who will take charge of this whole operation, including the printing and fixing of the labels.

Usually, a band or artist will have only a short working life in which to earn sufficient money to live on for the rest of their lives.

so before you start trying to make contact with the press, try to figure out what is engaging or unusual about you.

It was the American equivalent to the Bren gun only it, it was more like a rifle, it hadn't got a stand, you know, more like a rifle butt, you know.

`In the past, I've used researchers to dig around in libraries, but I've always done all the hard work myself, and certainly all the major interviews.

The London based group Books Etc gave an indication of the kind of impact this had on booksellers.

Water authorities that will make a splash: Jeremy Warner on investment in the floated water authorities

Reminding her at length, in case she hadn't made a note of it, of the Christmas holiday schedule for the library.

Female chimpanzees do not often hunt, but they nevertheless play an important rolein hunting, and they usually end up gaining access to significantportions of meat.

But, in fact, it doesn't seem to be doing much harm and may be filling a niche that, in the absence of European mink in these islands, was lying empty.

But, in fact, it doesn't seem to be doing much harm and may be filling a niche that, in the absence of European mink in these islands, was lying empty.

I mean, one's, one's entitled to ask I think ifthere is no problem, if we only have vacancies of two or three in ourelderly persons homes throughout the county wh erm why on earth did thedirector of the social serv , did the director of social services and his deputy at themeeting on the twenty fifth of August of the social services committee,say that this was the greatest problem which was facing this council.

I mean, one's, one's entitled to ask I think ifthere is no problem, if we only have vacancies of two or three in ourelderly persons homes throughout the county wh erm why on earth did thedirector of the social serv , did the director of social services and his deputy at themeeting on the twenty fifth of August of the social services committee,say that this was the greatest problem which was facing this council.

Now er there are some areas based in my area where you wouldn't get the fire station, the fire engine through the bottleneck in ten minutes erm, all this has got to be put in its relative priority.

Now er there are some areas based in my area where you wouldn't get the fire station, the fire engine through the bottleneck in ten minutes erm, all this has got to be put in its relative priority.

Each sacrifice, upheld by God's promise and power had real effect and potency, but this was not a power that could be manipulated by man.

Start with small sprigs of the foliage that will form the body of the arrangement and push them into the foam at random to make a fairly even shape, as seen from all sides.

Clinical tests have shown this frequency gives the best balance between thorough cleaning and personal comfort.

However, I would suggest you wait a little while before making your final decision.

Right: Clarissa wears her own make-up, which Judith updated to give a softer look (far right).

One may venture to make the proposition that the roots go back to the short­lived but glorious revolution of October 1956.

In an industrial situation, for instance, the witness can often give helpful corroborative evidence as to the process of the machinery involved in the accident, and might be able to give some useful suggestions aboutprevious complaints and the personalities of the parties involved.

In an industrial situation, for instance, the witness can often give helpful corroborative evidence as to the process of the machinery involved in the accident, and might be able to give some useful suggestions aboutprevious complaints and the personalities of the parties involved.

The solicitor is entitled to charge the broad average direct cost of doing the work.

But they took no notice and jacked her out anyway, and the hospital was crammed with the odour of disinfectant and medicines and mechanicalsolidities that drove the pretty meanings away.

Oh, David, it won't do any harm to try!'

I didn't realise you might be doing a late shift, but it's imperative I see you.'

He doesn't smoke or drink, and even if he wanted to, two heart attacks and a by-pass operation have made the decision for him.

It wasn't satisfying in terms of sound, though, because you can't get any sound, even though you've got someone you considerto be the best guy out on the desk, but who happens to be three hundredyards away!

It wasn't satisfying in terms of sound, though, because you can't get any sound, even though you've got someone you considerto be the best guy out on the desk, but who happens to be three hundredyards away!

There is, moreover, a specially paradoxical version of it which arises from certain cases in which not only does extra conceptual content have to be introduced to characterize thehuman prohibition, but also the introduction of that content stands inconflict with the proposed biological explanation of it.

The first point is that you can't make a meaningful choice of subjects without adequate information.

a doctor who will give advice and treatment and may refer you to a specialist drug-abuse centre for help;

(b) On termination by the Buyer in accordancewith clause (a) the following provisions shall have effect: (i) all sums payable by the Buyer under the contract cease to be payable; (ii) theSeller must repay to the Buyer all sums paid by the Buyer prior totermination; and (iii) the Buyer is entitled to recover damages from the Seller in respect of any losses caused to the Buyer as a result of theSeller's failure to make delivery or as a result of the termination of the contract.

Alexander Vass leaned back in his chair and took a slow sip of his coffee.

However, although it is possible to use statements opening `I believe that…' to make a psychological report, that is not their only or their most usual use.

Before doing any deal, Hewlett-Packard would have to weigh whetherit would gain more from what would effectively be privileged access toSiemens' customers than it would lose in self-impact on its alreadystrong position in western Germany.

If it be a duty imposed by law upon a party regularly subpoenaed to attend from time to time to give his evidence then a promise to give him any remuneration for loss of time incurred in such attendance is a promise without consideration.

If it be a duty imposed by law upon a party regularly subpoenaed to attend from time to time to give his evidence then a promise to give him any remuneration for loss of time incurred in such attendance is a promise without consideration.

306, the Court of Appeal had held that a tradeassociation which by its constitution had power to put the name of aperson infringing its rules on a stop list, could instead lawfully askthe person concerned to make a money payment by way of compromise.

Moreover, why did the promisor make the promise if it was to have no legal effect?

These authorities suggest that a promise to pay money, or to do any other act, in a certain event but without any express or implied request to the promisee to bring about, or to promise to bringabout, that event, is made without consideration.

Melissa had no intention of obliging her.

The regulationist school could give a similar interpretation to the hegemony of national economies in each of the other periods of structural change in the UK economy.

individuals contemplating making a take-over offer for a company;

The total cost of this scheme was £60273.46 and by June 1980 this had been completely cleared and the Building Fund had a credit balance of £2603.63.

The total cost of this scheme was £60273.46 and by June 1980 this had been completely cleared and the Building Fund had a credit balance of £2603.63.

Do you want to take my toaster and you can do toast?

Has it got a film in it?

It will be noticed that these two items have common elements; their time periods overlap, so that anyone doing a comprehensive study on the first half of the twentieth centurywould want both items if he was really very thorough, and the interestof Women's Liberation students would be caught by the first item and bypart of the second item.

This detailed investigation revealed that,although in broad terms the earlier proposals were supported, the totalnumber of files held by the departments (ie approximately 60,000), andthe variety of ways in which outposted files were managed and used,would make the cost of providing a sophisticated computer system throughout excessively high, compared to the benefits that could accrue.

These interviews followed a semi-structured format, each person being given a set of preinterview notes posing questions aboutroles, responsibilities, information needs, and their usage of theexisting filing systems.

You may be still getting this cotton wool treatment, and may not want to relinquish it.

Why do I always look at houses that I can't, I've got, not got the remotest chance of owning?

Why do I always look at houses that I can't, I've got, not got the remotest chance of owning?

I don't laugh, but I do smile.

I don't laugh, but I do smile.

The trouble with arriving early at a park is you don't look convincing pretending to take an interest in the roses.

That is why I personally put the plan into operation, aided by Colonel Radl of the Abwehr, who's had a heart attack, I understand, and is not expected to live.'

Claylands of England can take nuclear waste

I do not want to give the wrong impression by quoting that slogan of a well-known Sunday newspaper.

The problem is that to get sufficient heating at the site of the tumour from an externalsource generates unacceptable levels of heat in the healthy soft tissues surrounding the tumour.

The technical director of Magnesium Elektron and chairman of the Manchester Section, Frank Farnworth, made the presentation on behalf of the Society and this was followed by a tour of the Zirconium Chemicals Plant and lunch.

`Joisey' is still the butt of jokes made by NewYork sophisticates, but its political leaders, like the outgoingGovernor Kean, now have national stature and have taken the lead in forming social policy for the rest ofAmerica on welfare reform, school financing, public housing and care ofthe environment.

This is to be expected, and it is reasonable forthe vendor to request that the receivers of confidential informationenter into such agreements, confirming that they will make no use of it other than for the specific purpose of evaluating the proposed buy-out.

Half felt the error was so common that they voted to give up its etymological origin - `to become public'.

And to get, what it says here, to get quality assurance, the patient's views, and the care-giver's views have to be in agreement.

And to get, what it says here, to get quality assurance, the patient's views, and the care-giver's views have to be in agreement.

I'll have to do some work.

The significance of this will be apparent when it is realized that, while the sportsman is trying to get a sight of the tiger, the tiger in all probability is trying to stalk the sportsman, or is lying up in wait for him.

He also has regular part-time work as a lab technician.

The fossil record is full of curious plants that do not fit comfortably into classifications - this is one of the things that makes the study of fossil plants so fascinating.

There is also a small possibility of infection via breast milk, and in the developed world doctors recommend that women with HIV do not breast feed.

Anyone who is antibody positive will find it impossible to get life assurance, should they apply for it.

There are no easy answers, but it will help to get as much information as you can and to talk to a sympathetic doctor of midwife before making a decision.

It is impossible to tell whether or not your partner has HIV from his or her appearance - so why take the risk with one another's lives?

If ink was then rolled on and the plate washed, the ink remained only in the tiny `bitten' spaces, giving the finely granulated appearance of the finished aquatint already referred to.

I'd go down through the choir practice room and St Andrew's chapel beneath it, make a quick call at the sacristy (where Holy Harding does hisserving), then cross the quire to the south side, where, with the helpof the Talisman of Shag, I would enter the-spiral stair at ground level, and so - relicless but, hopefully, bearing precious manna for theinvalid - to the Sanatorium (formerly known as the Wheel Room) and,after that, bed.

You can all do a picture of a rainbow.

To take an extreme example, if all the additional income received werewithdrawn from the circular flow of income, the multiplier would beequal to l and the final rise in income would be just equal to theinitial rise in spending and no more.

You are given the following information:

They are also useful in - flexible manufacturing systems' - robots that can be programmed to do a variety of jobs.

He frequently had be gave the impression of a man supported entirely by mechanical means.

Don't worry about some Strangelove of a character turning your innocent little toy into a satellite vaporiser, theory has it that military research is second rate because you cannot do good research behind screens of secrecy and away from the cut and thrust of peer review.

Don't worry about some Strangelove of a character turning your innocent little toy into a satellite vaporiser, theory has it that military research is second rate because you cannot do good research behind screens of secrecy and away from the cut and thrust of peer review.

Once all the relevant information needed to make a placement decision has been obtained, it is necessary to consider what educational opportunities are at present available for thevisually handicapped pupil and sometimes what new opportunities,especially in integrated provision, can be developed.

Despite the very real and sometimes overwhelmingdifficulties faced by schools and teachers as a result of underfundingand professional unrest, there are encouraging signs of change andreform which, if successful, could have a significant impact not only on children with special needs but on all children.

Fabric boots had already made a comeback in quantity, encouraged by several years of hot, dry summers and a wider market.

They were discovered by environmentalists doing a survey of the region's flora and fauna.

Y plus cos X, but we can't differentiate that straight off without changing and doing the substitution.

So they did the switch, cleared their debts, and now £6 a month better off.

A clutch of companies involved in technology from the Soviet space programmes has been given permission for the first time to deal direct with foreigners.

She stayed with us for a month while we regained our strength, doing all the cooking and washing until my mother was fit enough to take over.

When going into a supermarket to buy cabbages, onions, carrots or eggs, just give a little thought as to how these came to be on the shelves - the early planting and worrying about frosts, packing and carting to the shops.

And when M S U did their review that post just got

Have you actually did an opinion poll?

And over the years it's been possible to identify a number of factors produced by these bacteria that seem to make sense in terms of the pathology and the conditions.

The debate between legal theorists and theircritics is about the degree of autonomy possessed by the legal systemfrom economy and society, the role of historical, cultural andcontingent factors (the `dynamics' of the legal system) and about thepossibility of giving a coherent explanation to the `internal' structure of the legal system, once its detachment from other factors is recognised.

Now the District Council have taken a lot ofmoney off this town, over the market stalls now, for a number of years,and I believe if they're going to do a scheme like this which has been going on now for over eight years, it should be done all in one go.

Now the District Council have taken a lot ofmoney off this town, over the market stalls now, for a number of years,and I believe if they're going to do a scheme like this which has been going on now for over eight years, it should be done all in one go.

Most of them would also have borrowed in the open market, maybe from a clearing bank where they had a current account and the manager had allowed them to draw overand above what was in it - an overdraft (the cheapest way of borrowing?) - or perhaps a Personal Loan.

Most of them would also have borrowed in the open market, maybe from a clearing bank where they had a current account and the manager had allowed them to draw overand above what was in it - an overdraft (the cheapest way of borrowing?) - or perhaps a Personal Loan.

Most of them would also have borrowed in the open market, maybe from a clearing bank where they had a current account and the manager had allowed them to draw overand above what was in it - an overdraft (the cheapest way of borrowing?) - or perhaps a Personal Loan.

And er so this student came to and I organized a conference and took the chair for him you know and er and helped him every possible way.

As a matter of fact er as the years went by we got this benevolent fund and we used to give all the old w as a mat we got a pension fund I know it don't sound much now, but at thattime like during and just after the War we paid twelve and sixpence aweek pension to all everybody who'd retired from the union after they'ddone time, and we also gave them extra grants and took them on er youknow outings until a time I said, Well we're spending all this money onoutings, we could buy a bungalow at the seaside and let them all go youknow pensioners go in their turn free.

You may need to remain nearby in case they do slip, but this can prevent some people from functioning so you will have to be sensitive to their feelings.

And he added, in a voice that would have done credit to an elder of the Wee Frees, `If he is yer brother, then ye've been committin' incest.

`Why the hell don't we stop here and get some sleep?'

But where local law is absent or ambiguous, andBritish courts have the opportunity to shape the law according to theirnotion of an appropriate public policy, they should give effect to the policy laid down by the Convention.

In exercising his discretion, he is entitled to take into account any consideration of public policy which bears on the issue -and the public policy in favour of free speech is important in decidingwhether to launch official secrets or contempt or obscenityprosecutions.

The" right of reply" privilege was established by the House of Lords in the case of Adam v Ward: The plaintiff, anofficer but not a gentleman, used his position as an MP to make a vindictive attack upon a General in his former regiment.

The council, applicant and any interested parties are invited to write to the inspector giving their objections or support for the proposed development.

The inspector will then make a recommendation - though this is occasionally ignored by the DoE.

Apocalypse was in the air, and in strictaccordance with the traditions of this connected history of fears ofBritish decline, the ghosts of Rome were summoned to make their judgement.

Cutts did the grand slam of all four events in last season's areafinals, but following two eliminations in the last round, will have tofight hard to qualify for just one in the current campaign.

PROFESSIONAL footballers talked about their personal goals when they gave a talk on physical fitness to an Essex joggers' club.

`To take pain without moaning, for instance.

The animal did not even trouble to look up as Mungo passed; probably feeling, as he did, that this part of the day was best enjoyed alone.

The animal did not even trouble to look up as Mungo passed; probably feeling, as he did, that this part of the day was best enjoyed alone.

`Once or twice,' she admitted, as her next bowl ran straight at the first, making contact with a gentle `klok'.

Nevertheless, to strengthen his alibi, it might be a good idea to do some more work for Jos.

Alice did a small, frail mime to show how Jos had struggled.

If I got a new beat, I'd go round the beat and say, `Get to the kerb!' and they'd move to the kerb reluctantly.

Their fine physique and smart appearance made a very favourable impression.

His father objected that the police had arrested him unlawfully, because the law lays it down that no-one is allowed to do on Sunday the work by which he earns a living, and the police were therefore not allowed to arrest anybody on a Sunday.

This does take a bit of sussing out, but once mastered it all makes sense.

The moral is that the need to clearly communicate findings must always take precedence over considerations of technical adequacy.

There was no real administrative virtue in both officers recording entries, and the Writer of the Tallies seems to have done the work in a more effective manner.

" It doesn't make sense", was a common complaint.

The significant difference was that by the 1750s this speculation in land looked like making good sense.

Their edges, beyond the pages, were dyed soot-black, giving the impression of the borders of mourning cards.

Hence, to issue new shares at a substantialdiscount to the market price and then underwrite it would appear to be a case of double indemnity in which the primary insurer is assured of avery small probability of having to make a compensation payment.

Tonight she had resolved to make the break with the tourist side of herself.

In January, after the authorities reportedly failed to take action on this case, his family filed a suit against three police officers on charges of murder.

Your faith in his expertise was ill-founded, and does no credit to an officer of your rank and experience.'

However to take no action would be worse than to risk insulting the dead.

In making the decision the parents should bear in mind that once anykind of commitment to a religion is made, it is always more difficultfor there to be a change of course, even when the commitment is made onbehalf of the individual when a helpless baby.

In making the decision the parents should bear in mind that once anykind of commitment to a religion is made, it is always more difficultfor there to be a change of course, even when the commitment is made onbehalf of the individual when a helpless baby.

In making the decision the parents should bear in mind that once anykind of commitment to a religion is made, it is always more difficultfor there to be a change of course, even when the commitment is made onbehalf of the individual when a helpless baby.

Your solicitor will do a local search if you buy a property, but you may be renting in which case no one will do a search for you.

Your solicitor will do a local search if you buy a property, but you may be renting in which case no one will do a search for you.

Where the peace is threatened, the law confers upon the constable a very wide range of powers to take preventive action.

They are also bringing white feminists to examine their extreme debt to the civil rights movement, recognize theirmonoculturalism, and take their attention to race issues beyond a fatalistic acknowledgement of current shortcomings.

The fact that he obviously thought she was a good nurse pleased her and gave her confidence, while the fact that Belinda had not betrayedhis secret and gossiped about his wife and her illness earned hisgratitude and respect, so that now they were allies and she knew shewould be able to go to him if ever she had a problem at the hospital.

Then, taking a deep breath as if she were about to plunge into a pool ofunknown depth and temperature - which, perhaps, she was - she continued, `But could you tell me a bit more about what the work would entail?'

Horrified… and yet strangely relieved andsatisfied, and tingling with primitive energy and release, she turned on her heel and threaded so nimbly through the crowded guests that shereached the French doors that opened on to the side veranda before Greghad recovered enough to take a single step.

We went upstairs to the diningroom, turned the knob, took a deep breath and went in.

But they hadn't done any harm.

But, when you do check, make certain that you have maintainedstraight and level flight just previously, and that you continue to doso if re-setting the DI.

There was no need to take food through the hall.

She thought, child of an experimental scientist that she was, that she would make the test for herself and not take the easy way out of asking those experts in all matters Anglican, Theodora and Ian.

Would that make sense in a Cathedral setting, eh Tallboy?'

The newspaper industry was therefore among the first to make use of the development of scientific surveys for measuring opinion.

This means that calculation of the slope isstraightforward, according to the formula in section 10.4: it is givenby finding out how much Y changes for a unit change in X , namely We can now make a fairly precise summary statement: on average, 19 more people per 1000 arechronically ill for each death; (mortality was measured per 10,000,while illness only per 1000).

These wines do lack, however, the depth, elegance and persistenceof the Pinot Noir and its characteristics tend to peak early and fallaway quickly.

Although a vineyard thus cultivated always appears to contain vines of no more than three years of age, they do of course all issue from their parent plants, thus a`pre-phylloxera' vine nowadays will be either three or eighty years old, depending upon how it is viewed.

I hit the door handle and did a dip and shuffle so that my head was below the knife slash arc and made an undignified but unscathed exit, taking the keys with me.

And that answer fitted every question he was asked, as did his response to any poser that could be put to him `thirty-five years'.

`He was too concerned to do a good performance to be really funny.

`We wanted a certain type and Betty White, our casting director, said there was this young man in revue we ought to have a look at.'

With an orchestra you've just got one sense; you're just listening.'

Unfortunately your two attacks have left Samson very tired and he hasn't enough energy to move.

Unfortunately your two attacks have left Samson very tired and he hasn't enough energy to move.

They formed a partnership solely to enter the competition, and did no other work together.

how to be ta er the wheels on that fire engine it had got the registration , had you noticed?

In the old days, there would have been two or three servants to do the monthly wash.

Can you make sense of that?'

If he gave a false name and address, substituted service will not be ordered, Clarke v Vedel [1979] RTR 26.

The plaintiff will not be allowed to give evidence at trial of any special damage not explicitly claimed in his pleadings or particulars (Ord 18, r12).

Jude had given up trying to make contact.

`I can slip it to him just before `Question Time' when I do my check up,' said Matron.

It had a long, narrow study, a bedroom, an antechamber, and a big kitchen, and there was enough room for them to hold a private New Year's ball.

It is this which makes the performance capable of repetition.

Pointes can and do have an enormous part to play in classical ballet because there are so many ways in which they can be used to give character and variety to a role.

you're finding it much more difficult to carry on because you've gone through the whole night working, the night is wellalong and it becomes increasingly more difficult to stay awake sophysically, spiritually, whatever way you look at it, it is certainlyvery difficult to stay awake in the truth today, but it isn't thatdifficult and it isn't er a hurdle that none of us can overcome, Jehovah says that his load is light, Jesus echoed that didn't he and it is true that if we do Jehovah's will, Jehovah's way, then it will be made light for us, he will help us to stay awake, but he's not going to allow us toslumber and drift off into obscurity, but it all comes back in hingesupon us and that's why the counsel is in verse thirteen as a day, as in a day time look, let us walk decently so we have to do something don'twe?

you're finding it much more difficult to carry on because you've gone through the whole night working, the night is wellalong and it becomes increasingly more difficult to stay awake sophysically, spiritually, whatever way you look at it, it is certainlyvery difficult to stay awake in the truth today, but it isn't thatdifficult and it isn't er a hurdle that none of us can overcome, Jehovah says that his load is light, Jesus echoed that didn't he and it is true that if we do Jehovah's will, Jehovah's way, then it will be made light for us, he will help us to stay awake, but he's not going to allow us toslumber and drift off into obscurity, but it all comes back in hingesupon us and that's why the counsel is in verse thirteen as a day, as in a day time look, let us walk decently so we have to do something don'twe?

you're finding it much more difficult to carry on because you've gone through the whole night working, the night is wellalong and it becomes increasingly more difficult to stay awake sophysically, spiritually, whatever way you look at it, it is certainlyvery difficult to stay awake in the truth today, but it isn't thatdifficult and it isn't er a hurdle that none of us can overcome, Jehovah says that his load is light, Jesus echoed that didn't he and it is true that if we do Jehovah's will, Jehovah's way, then it will be made light for us, he will help us to stay awake, but he's not going to allow us toslumber and drift off into obscurity, but it all comes back in hingesupon us and that's why the counsel is in verse thirteen as a day, as in a day time look, let us walk decently so we have to do something don'twe?

The DFG has long realised the shortcomings of the normal 1-year grant: it does not give enough resources and security to build up a substantial group or programme in a particular area.

Aggressive people, on the other hand, may deny the error and argue or criticize back in order to take the attention away from themselves.

Now spend some time, if possible with a dictionary or a thesaurus, making out a chart for yourself-exploring some of the feelings you experience.

But as for doing a whole exchange of shows, like with the Russians in the past well, we might do it if we got compensation for it.

But as for doing a whole exchange of shows, like with the Russians in the past well, we might do it if we got compensation for it.

He was, at the time, a well known art expert who knew Malevich well, had done some work on Mandelstam's poetry, and was regarded as an expert on Mayakovsky.

I do not think either that we can make sense of the Devil in the language of contemporaryphilosophy or science; on the other hand neither do I believe that weshould try and invent a modern mythology that makes the Devil morecredible and accessible.

Rousseau, who was an incurable romantic, wantedto preserve the community of innocent and primitive social life, butwanted the community to take precedence over the rights of its individual members.

Before the king made a grant of new privileges in the forest, the warden was often ordered to summon a jury to hold aninquest ad quod damnum , to ascertain the extent of the loss the Crownwould incur by making the grant.

Before the king made a grant of new privileges in the forest, the warden was often ordered to summon a jury to hold aninquest ad quod damnum , to ascertain the extent of the loss the Crownwould incur by making the grant.

But it seems more likely that on this occasion a handful of key politicians and civil servants actually took the lead; Peter Walker at the Department of theEnvironment (DOE) and Robert Carr, Home Secretary (the Home Office setup the Urban Deprivation Unit in 1972), were clearly influential, andDerek Morrell was a key official over CDP in the Home Office.

Post-war housing policy has also had a major visual impact through different approaches to the architectural style of dwellings provided in the public sector.

Post-war housing policy has also had a major visual impact through different approaches to the architectural style of dwellings provided in the public sector.

Chris took the chair and I went through the list of things thatneeded to be done to get us off the ground: a bank account, an addressand telephone number somewhere, an eye-catching logo.

He woke her gently, and as the mists sank back into the river in the sunlight, they made love.

Although the symbolism of the serpent is universal, in no two countries does the relationship appear to possess such complimentary sociological, philosophical and metaphysical components.

This is the grey area, we didn't call on the company we called on the implants and I hope we haven't done any damage, but what we have done and what the p

This is the grey area, we didn't call on the company we called on the implants and I hope we haven't done any damage, but what we have done and what the p

This is the grey area, we didn't call on the company we called on the implants and I hope we haven't done any damage, but what we have done and what the p

Yes we need to, if we're gonna do a deal.

Therefore they must necessarily make reference to that history.

One need make no reference to a male human person who is proclaimed Lord.

Flaps are described in detail for the many pilots who do not fully understand how to make the best use of them, and who may be nervous about their first flights in a flapped machine.

Pilots should be encouraged to make an assessment during the final turn of how much airbrakethey will need as they start to straighten up for the final approach,instead of waiting until the turn is completed at which point it isalready too late.

The central idea of the Town and Country Planning Act was to make possible the control of development without incurring charges for compensation, by the device of nationalising all development rights in advance.

The general election of 31 March 1966 gave the Labour party a comfortable working majority and removed any uncertainty about the movement towards comprehensive education.

A limited number of boarding-schools shouldtherefore be drawn into a partnership with the State, by agreeing togive at least 50 per cent of their places to pupils formally assessed as having a boarding need.

If we had been aware of the remarks, I suppose it might have been better not to have made the appointment.'

It looked as if the Saunders-Atkinson partnership had done the trick for Villa again in the 77th minute.

`It is difficult to get full information here, but it is not something we want to comment on.'

Ken Tyrell talks of the new board taking legal action against Walkinshaw for the unlawful deal.

If I hadn't, Manchester United would never have made an offer for me.

PAUL LOUGHLIN hopes to make as big an impact for St Helens today as when he was last at Knowsley Road.

But by that time, Faldo had already done the damage.

We even had a hot line set up between thereception at London Weekend and Number 10, and a call did come through,but thankfully it was after we'd done the show, when she was having a drink in the hospitality room.

I used to have a special gimmick - when I used to do my clog dance, I used to shout to the audience, `Throw pennies,' and that's what they used to do.

Right, time marches on we've got five minutes before this meeting closes, so if you've got another question, I'll take one more question for Chris and then she's off the hook.

The possibility that a dichotic right ear superiority is due to subjects being required to give a verbal response prompted Springer (1971, 1973) to presentconsonant-vowel syllables either dichotically or opposed by white noise(a mixture of all possible sound frequencies) and to use manual reaction time to a target syllable as her response measure.

Even in the northern counties, Scottish raidswere never as frequent or as deeply penetrating as they had been inEdward II's reign, and although the inhabitants of those counties madethe most of their plight in petitions for relief from taxation, theraids in the years after 1332 did little long-term damage to the region's economy.

If you're gonna do this have you thought of this and what about this and how does this work.

If you're gonna do this have you thought of this and what about this and how does this work.

Well you could never, you could never rely on shipment, cos one time you'd get a lot of shipment and the next time you might be six weeks and get no shipment, so who's gonna pay them their money?

Well you could never, you could never rely on shipment, cos one time you'd get a lot of shipment and the next time you might be six weeks and get no shipment, so who's gonna pay them their money?

and was taken out o the they don't do, they don't do the work now they used to do and years gone by.

and was taken out o the they don't do, they don't do the work now they used to do and years gone by.

and was taken out o the they don't do, they don't do the work now they used to do and years gone by.

and was taken out o the they don't do, they don't do the work now they used to do and years gone by.

and was taken out o the they don't do, they don't do the work now they used to do and years gone by.

Yes you reminded erm er Jim about the, the erasking why you asked for recommendations, pinpointed handled theobjections excellently erm I'd actually put video not available but youbrought it in so you've got a cross here and it's got yes you, yes it was

but if you think about it, if you've done a good job, you've done a good presentation, done a good fact find and they buy, then they should be very happy at that moment in time and er it was stupidbecause that is the right time to actually ask

but if you think about it, if you've done a good job, you've done a good presentation, done a good fact find and they buy, then they should be very happy at that moment in time and er it was stupidbecause that is the right time to actually ask

Tony would you do the table?

We're gonna have to get a tyre gauge I reckon they've got a new depth of tread one point six millimetres which is bigger than the.

We're gonna have to get a tyre gauge I reckon they've got a new depth of tread one point six millimetres which is bigger than the.

I haven't got any leave.

Her husband erm, had a stroke`Nonni's

Just because the recogniser has little confidence in a particular character need bear no resemblance to whether or not that is the incorrect character in a misspelled word.

That they are all up to date and er I'll just do a final check up after the meeting.

I believe it's the intention of the authorities to try and do some very detailed work over the coming months, then armed with thatdetailed assessment and hopefully armed with your recommendations theymay aim to be pr proceed to the modification step of the structure planin a way that which will lead to a speedy conclusion.

It gives scope for the hobby-electronics enthusiast to try out his own ideas, and for those who don't the design as it stands provides a useful power supply unit.

Your main concern may be getting work in a post commensurate with your past experience and abilities.

The company notes that the action signals itsability to use early redemption or repurchase programmes as part ofcontinuing efforts to reduce debt and make best use of its cash.

Erm it is a social gathering and whether people get er, er get rooked er, they get done or whether they get a bargain or whatever happens, they, they seem to enjoyit, but nevertheless it's done according to whether you want to makemoney, the person owning the land wants to make a bit of money, thereare a number of entrepeneurs who actually arrange and the middleman whoactually goes round booking up the sites and so when you're talkingabout charity a charity will get it organised for you by an entre ,entrepeneur and then there's the er the er the traders themselves, someof whom may be purely independent,

Erm it is a social gathering and whether people get er, er get rooked er, they get done or whether they get a bargain or whatever happens, they, they seem to enjoyit, but nevertheless it's done according to whether you want to makemoney, the person owning the land wants to make a bit of money, thereare a number of entrepeneurs who actually arrange and the middleman whoactually goes round booking up the sites and so when you're talkingabout charity a charity will get it organised for you by an entre ,entrepeneur and then there's the er the er the traders themselves, someof whom may be purely independent,

Erm it is a social gathering and whether people get er, er get rooked er, they get done or whether they get a bargain or whatever happens, they, they seem to enjoyit, but nevertheless it's done according to whether you want to makemoney, the person owning the land wants to make a bit of money, thereare a number of entrepeneurs who actually arrange and the middleman whoactually goes round booking up the sites and so when you're talkingabout charity a charity will get it organised for you by an entre ,entrepeneur and then there's the er the er the traders themselves, someof whom may be purely independent,

Erm it is a social gathering and whether people get er, er get rooked er, they get done or whether they get a bargain or whatever happens, they, they seem to enjoyit, but nevertheless it's done according to whether you want to makemoney, the person owning the land wants to make a bit of money, thereare a number of entrepeneurs who actually arrange and the middleman whoactually goes round booking up the sites and so when you're talkingabout charity a charity will get it organised for you by an entre ,entrepeneur and then there's the er the er the traders themselves, someof whom may be purely independent,

`I had to make a guess this morning,' she told Alina, glancing backover her shoulder from the Cona machine as she waited for the water torun down through the filter.

Out in the big hall, the DJ made a smooth change between tracks.

At the hospital, I had to wait thirty minutes before getting attention.

The English, or for that matter, people anywhere, have not got a monopoly on stupidity and evil intent.

Exhibitors also complain they have to put up with the theft of their merchandise, and suspect their bills are inflated by `ghost' workers, who are paid but do no work.

The faience plaques Evans discovered in the EastWing of the Knossos Labyrinth probably originally fitted together,jigsaw-fashion, to make a picture of a complete town; it may have been a townunder attack from invaders, like the town shown on the silver SiegeRhyton found at Mycenae.

This figurine, aptly nicknamed `The Poppy Goddess', dates from about 1350 BC and makes a clear connection between the manifestation of the deity and the taking of opium.

Even so lucid a director as Trevor Nunn, however, has trouble in making complete sense of a work which appears to welcome wholesale destruction with open arms.

Among the Tchambuli, yet further variationoccurred: men adorned themselves, gossiped, made things for trade, while women selected their partners, made the sexual advances, did all the trade, and were the more aggressive sex.

Andy took a deep breath and patted my head, chuckling.

What she saw took her breath away.

That night, walking down to the lodge to do her shift, she was surprised to see Matthew deep in discussion with two members of the Royal Canadian Mounted Police.

Who the heck is doing the hiring and firing around here, anyway?'

`So doing the solo record was a real confidence-builder in my life.

If this is not done a disillusioned employee may well leave after a short time and you will have to repeat the expensive and disruptive process of interviewing all over again.

Whether writing in response to an advertisement or making a general enquiry about work, the following points apply

For example, if you have already made availableliterature dealing with questions such as holidays/pensions/conditionsof work and the candidate chooses to ask about them it may well indicate that she/he is the sort of person who does not do their background work thoroughly.

For example, if you have already made availableliterature dealing with questions such as holidays/pensions/conditionsof work and the candidate chooses to ask about them it may well indicate that she/he is the sort of person who does not do their background work thoroughly.

He also implied that the Arts Council might soon give greater emphasis to its former role as a policy body as well as a grant-giving organisation.

He also implied that the Arts Council might soon give greater emphasis to its former role as a policy body as well as a grant-giving organisation.

Most CASE uses have to take output from a front-end CASE tool and create applications with a 3GL programming language or a back-end CASE tool.

Sun Microsystems Inc is spreading its favours around, and after doing a big deal with Oracle Corp on its manufacturingsoftware, has now signed a new unlimited use licence for variousdatabase products from Sybase Inc, Emeryville, California for deployment in its operations.

And do education at same time.

They took the escalator up and settled at a table overlooking the fountain.

Let me see - what does one need for a wedding?

`What did you dream?'

I think I'll try to get some sleep.'

We were sent out in pairs after 6 pm in the evening when all the paterfamilias who were left might be at home, to make a thorough census of the district and ask who might be in a house, when, and what were the provisions for even more serious raiding.

Then, `Come on we'd better make a start.

What their assets are worth is relevant for decisions about making the best use of them.

It has already been argued, in the previous chapter, that we all use oppositions to make sense of our experience.

Changes in technology and the associated decline in the size of the farm labour force have also had a profound effect on the relationship between the farm worker and his employer.

Changes in technology and the associated decline in the size of the farm labour force have also had a profound effect on the relationship between the farm worker and his employer.

Visiting me in hospital, hot foot from the Middle East, with his Brigadier's tabs and row of medals, he stroked hismoustache and said in crisp tones, `Pity you hadn't got a bit more promotion, boy.

Another possibility is to place two rectangular cakes together to make a football pitch.

Secret When the children are looking at their cards tell them to take one last look.

Tell your audience of children (or adults) that you are going to do an act combining mind reading with great mathematical ability.

It is tempting to take the cynical view that compact disc is `all in the numbers', and in most cases there is little to choose between them.

This would, in fact, make to the works, were it not for the fact thatthe packaging completely misleads the purchaser as to the playing orderof the music: it is listed as (in order) - but the disc actually plays , so that there's not a single track which corresponds with the onelisted in the sleeve note!

On 24 May they were given yet another destination - Hazenbrouck, in the S-W corner of the semi-circle round Dunkirk where the 1st Bucks were to make their last stand.

She needed several things she had not been ableto bring away from the Holborn house; chemises, petticoats, nightgowns,drawers, a frilled nightcap that had taken her fancy, stockings, handkerchiefs.

`It makes a bad example for the others.'

If you will permit me to make a suggestion, they would be better meantime with a tutor at home, and a governess for the girls.

Brisk afternoon winds do blow, exciting passages are possible, and there are many coves where you can anchor alone just to relax in perfect peace.

To do my family credit, no one actually said I looked like an animated barber's pole.

Thereafter, because he patently thought mylaughter geometry chart was the first sign of incipient lunacy, I wouldplay the lines, then turn upstage and make a huge gesture demonstrating the sausage shape of the laugh, which never failed to roll him up.

By February 1985, he had started to include allegations that Lord Aldington was a war criminal, and had made contact with Count Tolstoy, author of two books on the repatriations.

Worse still was the Tories' refusal year after year to make the essential commitment to the productive base of the economy - education and training, research and development, science, transport and communication.

Delegates also refused to give official recognition to existing black sections.

Appropriate information needed for a user to make a decision is also retrieved before presenting thecommand options, for example, maps with the correct specifications (e.g. with topological relations already created, when this is necessary forthe operation).

Have you got a red dress?

The third practice had overspent because it hadtaken over a smaller practice after the preparatory work on budgetsetting had been completed, and it had not been able to make an accurate estimate of prescribing costs for the 1300 patients involved.

Satellite surveillance is all very well, but it takes time to get information back and in that time a naval force can have moved a fair distance.

In a letter to the Stanford committee onresearch, the faculty said: `For years we have been able to tellvisiting school children, student, engineers, scientists, laymen and the press that we are here to do basic research on the fundamental properties of matter and that we do not do any military work.

In a letter to the Stanford committee onresearch, the faculty said: `For years we have been able to tellvisiting school children, student, engineers, scientists, laymen and the press that we are here to do basic research on the fundamental properties of matter and that we do not do any military work.

In a letter to the Stanford committee onresearch, the faculty said: `For years we have been able to tellvisiting school children, student, engineers, scientists, laymen and the press that we are here to do basic research on the fundamental properties of matter and that we do not do any military work.

A well-drafted clause will state that, if the parties cannot agree on who is to be the expert, a specified body will make the appointment on the application of either party.

So the capacity to make a thorough survey of the subject is inhibited by one of its most important characteristics.

If the loans were found to have been sold at a loss, the vendor would make a repayment, dependent on whether there had been a reduction in the bank's tax liability or not.

In the current judicial climate, difficulties in categorisation should not make a decision or award in contention any more likely to be upset.

The choice of reference, whether it is to be toexpert or arbitrator, is in any event usually made at the time of theoriginal contract which precedes the time when the parties know whetherthey have an" issue to settle" or a" formulated dispute", and they willbe obliged to use whatever procedure was stipulated, unless they make some fresh agreement.

The Secretary of State has power to allow alonger period for the giving of a notice of appeal but he will notnormally be prepared to exercise this power unless there are specialcircumstances which excuse the delay in giving notice of appeal.

Thus, while this concept and associated beliefsare central to Semai attitudes of dependency (by entailing theresponsibility of the group to nurture the individual by satisfying hisneeds, see Robarchek 1986b), it also buttresses the sense ofindividuality by giving a privileged position to individuals' wishes and motives.

This was made very clear to me early in my fieldwork when I offended a neighbour by trying to make explicit return of food that had been given to my wife and me.

This was made very clear to me early in my fieldwork when I offended a neighbour by trying to make explicit return of food that had been given to my wife and me.

She thought of Charles at the University of Suffolk, giving a lecture, perhaps, on Romantic landscape poetry, illustrated with slides.

In her heart Olga Stych hoped her mother would take the hint and depart.

He knew that she had not enjoyed his homecomingor the renewal of a sexual life; throughout their married life he hadbeen at home for only a few weeks at a time, and she had been free to make her life as she chose.

Indeed, Dr Tony Underwood of the University of Sydney suggests that to control the crown of thorns starfish could, in the end, do more harm to the reef than good.

We get some glimpse of what conditions would be like without water by observing modern deserts, which commonly fluctuate from +45°C toaround zero, in the course of twelve hours!

We would go to the markets and made a particular impact there.

I had to make a speech which a priest translated into Sesotho.

The sale was to have comprised both the unpaidfor items and pieces from Mr Narita's collection, acquired at a Tajanauction in April 1990 - the Japanese businessman having proved sensitive to Tajan's repeated pleas to make good the difference.

Since Vreeland's death in the mid-1980s, theCostume Institute lost some of its high profile, but if the newcurators' proposed shows are any indication, visitors will be given done focus rather than broad overviews.

The most dramatic development of the last quarter of a century has been the emergence of the urban-rural shift as a major factor in population redistribution, but in the late 1970s and early1980s its strength waned somewhat, as too did the pace of local decentralization, whereas the North-South divide reasserted itself at this time after a period of lower significance.

Quilling is the art of making picture with spirals of paper.

They did a great deal of damage to vineyards, roads, bridges and houses and threatened the villages of St Alfio, Fornazzo and Macchia.

A range of terms is also likely to be needed tohelp teachers and pupils to discuss aspects of spoken and writtenlanguage, in which pupils are required to do a range of things with their language: engage in small group collaborative discussions, present mini-lectures, explain andpersuade, write narratives, descriptions and arguments, etc.

The penny share flourishes on the fallacy that if you get more shares for your money, you must be getting a better buy.

The runner would tell him in cases when the dealer clearly did not mind whether or not he would get the best price for his client.

At the same time, between 12 and 14 IRA men selected to make the escape attempt were apparently preparing to blast an inside gate with some of the smuggled Semtex.

They uniformly show young, narrow-shouldered, and in so far as one can see through the draperies, narrow-hipped,flat-chested women with long pale hands which have clearly never done a stroke of work.

If you are very severely disabled, you may be able to get a grant from the Independent Living Fund.

Now, if you use any financial monitor that wehave, and bearing in mind the size of the task, any critical analysiswill reveal that this Council, under Labour, can definitely say thatit's met the challenge and it's certainly started to make the change.

well what I'll do I'll go and get some clothes, now what we do, we gonna take some food with us then?

and erm, he's got in the, in the fabric one he's got double doors and all the rolls of carpet and erm, he's got a table in there and obviously to make a cup of tea,got a couple of beds in there cos he's sold them and it's like a bigwarehouse and erm all around there there's a big concreted area, youknow, and er all these units and that's where we, we reckon it is.

and erm, he's got in the, in the fabric one he's got double doors and all the rolls of carpet and erm, he's got a table in there and obviously to make a cup of tea,got a couple of beds in there cos he's sold them and it's like a bigwarehouse and erm all around there there's a big concreted area, youknow, and er all these units and that's where we, we reckon it is.

and erm, he's got in the, in the fabric one he's got double doors and all the rolls of carpet and erm, he's got a table in there and obviously to make a cup of tea,got a couple of beds in there cos he's sold them and it's like a bigwarehouse and erm all around there there's a big concreted area, youknow, and er all these units and that's where we, we reckon it is.

Previously they had the conviction and the confidence but this tape was the final proof, the confirmation of the possibilities.

He had even provided, as an antagonist to North, a fictional member of the NSC, `Aaron Sykes', whose job it was to give flesh and voice to those invisible and voiceless colleagueswho had presumably tried to dissuade North from what he was doing: toappear, as the Laws appeared to Socrates, `humming in his ears', aboutthe offence he would cause to country, friends and laws if he did whatseemed to him the right thing.

The expanded auditors' report: could do better The APB's exposure draft needs some attention if it is to help to reduce the expectations gap

However, he does not feel that he can tender below the £21,960 cost, because the order would make a loss for the company.

So if the semantics/pragmatics distinction is to do any work at all, we can try and shift the study of indexicals into semantics.

In the absence of this information, it is soundpractice to make a secondary arrangement of key words; they cannot beleft as they are above, for they make sense only as their interrelation is explicitly shown.

Although you need complicated equipment to do a full analysis you can, however, get a good idea from the colour, smell and taste."

The Mercedes and Bentley may have been the show stars; elsewhere, though, son of beach buggy was making a comeback.

Two cars managed to avoid him, but RobertoMoreno, holding a steady fourth in the Benetton, ran straight into thefront of the Williams, doing serious damage to both.

The youngsters should be given their head, encouraged to develop their all-round skills.

Here the changes are an attempt to get clean possession.

But the richly spotted leaves of the pulmonaria have expanded gracefully to make a dense ground cover which hides most of the remains of the daffodils.

Napoleon and Hitler gave European unity a bad name.

The Pentagon made an unofficial translation, which did the rounds on Capitol Hill.

I sat alone in a compartment, coming to termswith the fact that I was free at last and if I wanted to put my feet upon the opposite seat or take off my tie, no one in uniform had the right to bustle in and call me Airwoman in that well-known disapproving voice.

Her mother disowned her and she was sent, as was the custom then, to live out her pregnancy in a girls' hostel near Cambridge, doing housework for her keep.

Whenever a new manager was brought in to take charge of them, they refused to co-operate: in the end we just had to take the porters on.'

Whenever a new manager was brought in to take charge of them, they refused to co-operate: in the end we just had to take the porters on.'

The process does work on genuinely dirty records but, unfortunately, cannot provide the Lazarus touch for discs that have been played ondecks that use a small chisel as a stylus.

`I did want to do this run without books.'

`I did want to do this run without books.'

The rest of the cast were called for three to do a complete rehearsal of all the scenes he was in.

Alex Household gave a twisted smile and announced ironically, `Right, here we go.

Grateful to the minister for that reply but would he not agree with me that where local authorities erm local chambers of commerce and trades councils er and his own department of employment,are already working well together with good small initiatives, to putupon them English Estates, TECs, British coal enterprise er is in factto do precisely what he does not advocate to make a mushrooming ofbureaucracy and will he not undertake to evaluate these initiative tosee if they really do work or whether they're just providing jobs for the boys.

Grateful to the minister for that reply but would he not agree with me that where local authorities erm local chambers of commerce and trades councils er and his own department of employment,are already working well together with good small initiatives, to putupon them English Estates, TECs, British coal enterprise er is in factto do precisely what he does not advocate to make a mushrooming ofbureaucracy and will he not undertake to evaluate these initiative tosee if they really do work or whether they're just providing jobs for the boys.

Grateful to the minister for that reply but would he not agree with me that where local authorities erm local chambers of commerce and trades councils er and his own department of employment,are already working well together with good small initiatives, to putupon them English Estates, TECs, British coal enterprise er is in factto do precisely what he does not advocate to make a mushrooming ofbureaucracy and will he not undertake to evaluate these initiative tosee if they really do work or whether they're just providing jobs for the boys.

She wanted to make sense of what had happened to her, why her mother hadn't wanted her.

Christopher, making a grab for the money, lunged and fell into George who fell into the coffee table and knocked over a vase of daisies,drenching the sofa, the carpet and a large part of Mrs Morrison.

If you're in any doubt about it, don't - you'll do less harm if you leave it than if you prune at the wrong time.

If you're in any doubt about it, don't - you'll do less harm if you leave it than if you prune at the wrong time.

Control Data Corp, as was, had planned to do a Gallium of the latest R4000 RISC for MIPS.

It has behind it an ideal; it aims primarily atgetting working men and women of this country abroad in order that thescales shall fall from their eyes through real comradeship with thosewho do the hard work in other countries.

Another simple way of giving a sense of life, even excitement, to static chords isthe string tremolo (either bowed tremolo or finger tremolo between twonotes) such as begins the Finale of Stravinsky's Firebird Suite .

It has forced the church to make a much greater distinction between traditional cultural roles and biblical responsibilities.

To find someone able to do the work look in the LRO ads We recently purchased a 1983 Land Rover County 110 2.25 petrol.

